Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-507.01
Connection with sanitary sewer; permit required; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to connect any property to a sanitary sewer, maintained by any sanitary drainage district or which has been or may hereafter be acquired from such district by the municipality located within such district and which is being maintained by such municipality, without first having applied for and obtained a permit from such district or municipality to establish such connection. The issuance of such a permit may be conditioned upon the payment of a deferred assessment as provided in section 31-514. Each day that a connection made unlawful by this section continues shall be a separate violation of this section. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars for each violation.

Laws 1957, c. 115, § 1, p. 395.